Arkansas, session 2025, HB1059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 42, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-42-131. Lifetime hunting and fishing license for providing
information on human trafficking.
(a) The Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission shall provide the
option for a free lifetime hunting and fishing license, with an optional
lifetime trout stamp and lifetime state duck stamp, for a commercial truck
driver who is a resident of this state and provides information to law
enforcement that leads to the:
(1) Rescue of a victim of human trafficking; or
*CRH032*
12/09/2024 9:45:04 AM CRH032

HB1059
(2) Conviction of an individual for human trafficking.
(b) The commission shall be reimbursed for the cost of a lifetime
hunting and fishing license provided under subsection (a) of this section
with funds appropriated for that purpose.
































12/09/2024 9:45:04 AM